src/twol-sme.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

! ========================================================================== !
!                   North Sámi morphophonological rule set                   !
! ========================================================================== !

! twol-sme.txt
! The file contains the rule set for the non-segmental
! North Sámi morphophonological rules

! m4 rules for selecting parts of the file to a certain application.
changequote(<<,>>)
changecom(<<!>>,<<
>>)
define(<<FLAGINIT>>,
<<ifdef(<<$1>>,<<define(<<$1>>,1)>>,<<define(<<$1>>,0)>>)>>)dnl
dnl
define(<<DIVNUM>>,0)dnl
define(<<ENDOMIT>>,<<popdef(<<DIVNUM>>)divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<ENDKEEP>>,<<popdef(<<DIVNUM>>)divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<OMITIF>>,
  <<pushdef(<<DIVNUM>>,ifelse(eval($1),0,0,-1))divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<KEEPIF>>,
  <<pushdef(<<DIVNUM>>,ifelse(eval($1),0,-1,0))divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl
define(<<ELSE>>,
  <<define(<<DIVNUM>>,ifelse(DIVNUM,0,-1,0))divert(DIVNUM)dnl>>)dnl

FLAGINIT(<<HYPHENATE>>)
FLAGINIT(<<SHORTCOMP>>)
FLAGINIT(<<DIPHSIMPL>>)
FLAGINIT(<<HUNSPELL>>)
FLAGINIT(<<ASPELL>>)

! HYPHENATE = To be used when making hyphenators - it allows surfacing of # and ^
! SHORTCOMP = Allows/encloses subnorm short compounds
! DIPHSIMPL = Allows/encloses subnorm diphthong simplification

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q   ! small
 r s t u v w x y z å ä ö ø æ %-
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q   ! capital
 R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Ø Æ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

 e7:e e9:e i7:i o7:o o9:o u6:u u7:u æ7:æ æ9:æ ! Morphophonemes

 č đ ŋ š ŧ ž          ! Sámi letters.
 Č Đ Ŋ Š Ŧ Ž          !

KEEPIF(HYPHENATE)
 # %^
ELSE
 #:0 %^:0
ENDKEEP

 ':0 %/ ¤:0 '7:'
			    ! ' is for CnsGrad of the lg:lgg and l'l:ll type
                            ! ¤:0 prevents ConsGrad in certain words
                            ! '7 is the real apostroph
                            ! # is used to mark both lexicalised and
                            ! derived compounds



 h7:h h8:h g8:g m8:m n8:n   ! the x8 ones are consonants that alternate in
 H7:H H8:H G8:G M8:M N8:N   ! stem-final positions.

 j9:j b9:b d9:d g9:g h9:h k9:k m9:m n9:n p9:p s9:s t9:t z9:z š9:š r9:r
 J9:J B9:B D9:D G9:G H9:H K9:K M9:M N9:N P9:P S9:S T9:T Z9:Z Š9:Š R9:R

                            ! The x9 ones are consonants that never alternate.
                            ! The capital J9 etc. do not work.
 X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0   ! diacritics
 Q1:0 Q2:0 Q3:0 Q4:0 Q5:0 Q6:0 Q7:0 Q8:0 Q9:0   ! They trigger morphophono-
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 Y9:0   ! logical rules
 W1:0 W2:0 W3:0 W4:0 W5:0 W6:0 W7:0 W8:0 W9:0

OMITIF(HUNSPELL)
 %>:0 %>7:%> »:0	! stem-suffix border mark, unvisible for normal use
ELSE
 %> »:%>			! stem-suffix border mark, only visible in Hunspell
ENDOMIT

KEEPIF(ASPELL)
 !Aspell tag deletion
 %/A:0 %/B:0 %/C:0 %/D:0 %/E:0 %/F:0 %/G:0 %/H:0 %/I:0 %/J:0 %/K:0 %/L:0 %/M:0
 %/N:0 %/O:0 %/P:0 %/Q:0 %/R:0 %/S:0 %/T:0 %/U:0 %/V:0 %/W:0 %/X:0 %/Y:0 %/Z:0
ENDKEEP

 ;

Sets
  Vow = a á e e7 e9 i i7 o o7 o9 u u6 u7 y æ æ7 ø å ä ö
        A Á E       I    O       U    Y Æ    Ø Å Ä Ö
        é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý
        É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý ;
  Cns = b b9 c č d đ d9 f g g8 g9 h h8 h9 j j9 k k9 l m m8 m9 n ŋ n8 n9
        B B9 C Č D Đ D9 F G G8 G9 H H8 H9 J J9 K K9 L M M8 M9 N Ŋ N8 N9
        p p9 r s š t ŧ v z ž z9 ' '7
        P P9 R S Š T Ŧ V Z Ž Z9 ;
  StemCns = b b9 d d9 g g8 g9 h h8 h9 j j9 l m m8 m9 n n8 n9 r s š
            B B9 D D9 G G8 G9 H H8 H9 J J9 L M M8 M9 N N8 N9 R S Š ;
  WeG = X4 X5 X6 X8 X9 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 W1 W4 W5 W7 ;
  Len = Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y9 ¤ ;
  Dummy = X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9
          Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 W1 W2 W3 W4 W5 W6 W7 W8 W9 ¤ %> %^ » ;
  FinalDummy = X2 X4 X7 X8 %> %^ » ;         ! This set is not in use !!
  NonMPDummy = X1 X4 X7 X8 ¤ %> %^ » ;
  NonMPDummy2 = X1 X4 ¤ %> %^ » ;
  HighVow = i i7 u u7 I U ;
  NonHighVow = a e e7 e9 o7 o9 o A E O ;
  Stop = k p t c č K P T C Č ;
  DelCns = g8 m8 n8 h8 G8 M8 N8 H8 ;
  CntrCns = s j h ž S J H Ž ;
  Hyph = %- ;


Definitions

! G3  = Vow Cns Cns Cns Vow ;
! G2  = Vow Cns Cns Vow ;
! G1  = Vow Cns Vow ;
! G12 = G1 | G2 ;

! The G1 gang

! The G2 gang

! The G3 gang
! đ'đ f'f l'l hl'l m'm n'n n'nj ŋ'ŋ r'r hr'r s's š'š ŧ'ŧ v'v
! bm dn dnj gŋ
! hcc hčč hpp hkk htt ddj
! llj
! bb dd gg zz žž
! r'bm r'dn r'dnj 'rgŋ
!đ'b, đ'b, đ'j, đ'v, i'b, i'c, i'd, i'f, i'g, i'k, i'l, i'hl, i'hm, i'hn, i'p, i'r, i's, i't, i'v, i'z,
!l'b, l'c, l'č, l'd, l'f, l'g, l'j, l'k, l'p, l's, l'š, l't, l'v, l'ž, m'b, m'p, m's, m'š, n'c, n'č, n'd,
!n's, n't, n'z, n'ž, ŋ'g, ŋ'k, r'b, r'c, r'č, r'd, r'f, r'g, r'j, r'k, r'p, r's, r'š, r't, r'v, r'z, r'ž,
!s'k, s'm, s'p, s't, š'k, š'm, š't, š'v, t'k, t'm, v'd, v'g, v'j, v'k, v'l, v'hl, v'p, v'r, v't, v'z, v'ž
!đ'bm d'gŋ i'bm i'dn i'gŋ l'bm l'dn l'gŋ v'dn v'dnj
!i'sk i'st m'šk n'sk n'st r'sk r'st v'sk
!k'c k'č k's k'st k'š k't

! G3 = Cns: Cns: Cns (Cns) | b m | d n | g ŋ | b b | d d | g g | z z | ž ž |

! Intuition:
! Have the => rule work in case of (upper or lower or both?) G3.
! Have the <=> rule work in al

! Define G12: Here we have <=>
! Define G3 (or not): Here (i.e. elsewhere) we have =>.

!Defining G1, G2, G3.
!Auxiliary definitions
G1  = Cns | h [l|r] | n j ;

!UCns = Cns: ;
!RLCns = :Cns;
!RealCns = UCns:LCns - ':0 ;
RealCns    = Cns - ':0 ;
all2Cns    = Cns Cns ;
real2CnsG3 =  b: m | d: n | g: ŋ | b: b: | d: d: | g: g: | z: z: | ž: ž: ; ! This could be the problem
2CnsG2     = all2Cns - real2CnsG3 ;
3CnsG2     = Cns RealCns Cns ; !!!!!!!!!!!!!!                        ! đ'b:đbb, đ'g:đgg, ...
fake8CnsG3 = Cns: ': Cns ;                                          ! đ'b:đ0b
3CnsG3     = h [ c c | č č | p p | k k | t t ] | [ d d | l l ] j  ;

!G2  = 2CnsG2 | 3CnsG2 ;
! 2CnsG2 is well-defined, 3CnsG2 is not. :-(

!G3  = fake8CnsG3 | real2CnsG3 | 3CnsG3 ;
!G3  = fake8CnsG3 ; !err
!G3  = real2CnsG3 ; !err
!G3  = 3CnsG3 ;     !err
! => All 3 parts of the G3 definition are flawed

!G12 = G1 | G2 ;                        ! This is what we waht
G12 = G1 | 2CnsG2 ; ! testing G2 parts  ! This we do while waiting for 3CnsG2.
! The second part of the G2 definitions is flawed.

! Pseudocode (see "Going for 2" below)
! Diphthongsimpl <=> _ G12 i j: ;
! OptDiphtsimpli  => _ G3  i j: ;








! ============ !
! Rule section !
! ============ !



Rules

!! Remainder! Change all #: to (Hyph) #:  in order to account for ealáhus- ja ...

! Introduction to the set of testwords (introduced with !€ and !$ that are added)
! -------------------------------------------------------------------------------

! (this documentation will be enlarged and moved to the documentation, and a trimmed version
! will be left here)

! For each rule, there is a set of word pairs to test. The words will be extracted into
! two files (the !€ words for positive tests, the !$ ones for negative tests, i.e. pairs that
! the parser shall reject.

! Basic usage is: (this paragraph shall be removed, as we want the one in the next paragraph)
! open twolc -utf8. Issue the following commands:
! install-binary bin/twol-sme.bin
! pair-test-file filename (where "filename" is the name of the file containing the test words)

! Usage (this is what we are aiming at):
! In the testing catalogue, issue one of the commands
! make twol-positive
! make twol-negative
! make twol-test (do both)
! This will extract the test pairs from this file, and print a report for each of the tests.
! The reports will be printed to report files named twol-pos.out and twol-neg.out. The reports
! are finally scanned by another script, which gives a warning if anything unexpected was found.

! We may also use other testfiles than the ones generated from this file (twol-sme.txt file).
! make twol-test TYPE=pos FILE=testfile   (when the file contains positive test pairs)
! make twol-test TYPE=neg FILE=testfile   (when the file contains negative test pairs)
! make twol-test FILE=testfile            (the default is TYPE=pos)
! make twol-test HELP                     (prints out these lines)

! The test cases are of two types:
! - positive tests
! - negative tests
!
! Positive tests are such that they require the pairs to match - if not, the rule (or
! another conflicting rule) is broken. These test pairs should be designed to check that
! the rule allways give the wanted mapping.
!
! Positive tests are marked with a € sign (and as a comment, to not infer with the
! regular rule compilation):
!
!€ áj'gi
!€ ái0gi
!
! Negative tests are pairs that should NOT match. The pairs should be designed such that
! they are likely but illegal pairs, so as to identify possible holes in the rules. Such
! holes will lead to overgeneration, and spurious acceptance of misspelled words, wrong
! analyses, bad generation, etc. Also, errors in the rules can lead to an inefficient
! analyser.
!
! Negative tests are also very important for regression testing: all bugs found and
! corrected should be added as negative pairs illustrating the bug that was corrected.
! This way, we can always check whether the bugs are still fixed or reintroduced by
! other bug fixes.
!
! Negative tests are marked with a dollar sign:
!
!$ mánnáX5jd
!$ má0ná0jd
!
! You may have more than one test word (pair) on each line, that is, you can have several
! pairs after each other on two lines separated by one or more spaces. This will save
! precious vertical space in the file, and make the rule file easer to read.
!
! The result/output is:
! REJECT
! ACCEPT
! Error
! and will be put into a separate test result file. A final script checks that the test
! result is what it should be, and reports the findings (ok/error(s) found).



! ============================ !
! Here begins the rule section !
! ============================ !

! j rule
! ------

"Postvocalic j Surfacing"
! j:i <=>  ( %>: ) ( »: ) [Vow:|:0] ( %>: ) ( :0 ) ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | ': | ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6:)+ (Hyph) [# | #:] ] ; !Thomas #699
  j:i <=>  Vow: ( %>: ) ( :0 ) ( Dummy: )* _ [ Cns | ': | ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6:)+ (Hyph) [# | #:] ] ; ! Kept Vow:, but accepted Dummies at length

!€ áj'gi
!€ ái0gi

!€ majdege
!€ maidege

!$ almmajX4in
!$ almmai0in

!€ mánnáX5jd
!€ má0ná0id

!€ almmájX4
!€ almmái0

!€ almmájX4X7-#
!€ almmái00-0

!€ almmájX4in
!€ almmáj0in

! Added ( :0 ) because of olmmoš !  new version for Troandin-bisma
! All j:i alternation is conflated into one rule. LC is vowel and optional
! (suffixinitial) dummy symbol, RC is consonant, dummy or word boundary,
! The intention is to have the strict operator (<=>), but catch the
! variation with a lot of (=all) contextual alternatives.
! exchanging DummyNotY5 with :0 - Y5: , better luck this time.

! Word final consonant alternations
! ---------------------------------

! Only alveolar consonants word-finally:

"Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"  !smirezit : smires, Troandin-bisma
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) Dummy:+) _ (':0 k:0) (ž:0) ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6: )( :0 - Y5: - Y6: ) [ Hyph | [ # | #: ] ]  ;
			where Cx in (z ž m h p g b d)
			      Cy in (s š n t t t t t)
			matched ;

!Testcases for the above rule:
!€ smirez#
!€ smires0

!€ Troandim#
!€ Troandin0

!€ Troandim-
!€ Troandin-

!€ muhtum#
!€ muhtun0

!€ skoalkkuh#
!€ skoalkkut0

!€ nagod#
!€ nagot0

!€ bávččag#
!€ bávččat0

!€ nuorab#
!€ nuorat0

!€ bávččag#
!€ bávččat0

!€ eamid#
!€ eamit0

!€ alih#
!€ alit0


!$ vejolažž#
!$ vejolaž00

!€ vejolažž#
!€ vejolaš00

!€ olmmožX4X7-
!€ olmmoš00-

! This test pair irrelevant, as line commented out.
!$ olmmožX7-
!$ olmmoš0-

!€ olmmožX4
!€ olmmoš0
